North Carolina, session 2025, HB557.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State television show.
"The Andy Griffith Show" is adopted as the official television show of the State of North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 557-First Edition